Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.020

Bonds—Terms—Execution—Rights of owner.

(1) Water redemption bonds shall be in denominations of not more than one thousand nor less than one hundred dollars each, and shall bear interest at a rate or rates as authorized by the city or town council, payable semiannually, and shall bear a serial number and shall be signed by the mayor of the city or town and shall be otherwise executed in such manner and payable at such time and place not exceeding twenty years after the date of issue as the city or town council shall determine and such bonds shall be payable only out of the special fund created by authority of this chapter and shall be a valid claim of the owner thereof only against that fund and the fixed portion or amount of the revenues of the water system pledged to the fund, and shall not constitute an indebtedness of the city or town. Such bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 66; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 46; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 23; 1965 c 7 s 35.89.020. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 2, part; RRS s 9154-2, part.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.